Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Kentucky Trails System

148.610.
Purpose of trails system.

In order to provide for the ever-increasing outdoor recreation needs of an expanding population and in order to promote public access to, travel within, and enjoyment and appreciation of the outdoor, natural and remote areas of the state, trails should be established in natural, scenic areas of the state, and in and near urban areas.

The purpose of KRS 148.610 to 148.780 is to provide the means for attaining these objectives by instituting a state system of scenic and recreation trails and by prescribing the methods and standards by which trails may be added to the system.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 288, § 2.

148.620.
Definitions.

Except as otherwise required by the context, the following terms when used in KRS 148.610 to 148.780 shall be construed respectively to mean:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department of Parks.

“Department” means the Department of Parks.

“System” means the “Kentucky Trails System” as established in KRS 148.610 to 148.780 and including all trails and trail segments, together with their rights-of-way.

“Scenic easement” means a perpetual easement in land which is held for the benefit of the people of Kentucky, is specifically enforceable by its holder or beneficiary, and limits or obligates the holder of the servient estate, his heirs, and assigns with respect to their use and management of land and activities conducted thereon, the object of such limitations and obligations being the maintenance or enhancement of the natural beauty of the land in question or of areas affected by it.

“Political subdivision” means any county, incorporated city, or other political subdivision of the state.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 288, § 3.

148.630.
Classes of trails established.

The state system of trails shall be composed of:

State scenic trails, which will be extended trails so located as to provide maximum potential for the appreciation of natural areas and for the conservation and enjoyment of the significant scenic, historic, natural, ecological, geological, and cultural qualities of the areas through which such trails pass. Each of these trails will be limited exclusively to foot use, except that the use of horses or off-road motorized vehicles or nonmotorized bicycles may also be permitted on segments of scenic trails where specifically designated by the department. Because of their extended length, the state scenic trails shall be supplemented by support facilities but only on that part of a trail which is in a state park or recreation area. Such support facilities may include, where deemed necessary and feasible, primitive shelters, fireplaces, safe water supply, and other related public-use facilities. These facilities shall comply with the state’s health standards. No open wood fires shall be permitted on state scenic trails except in areas with support facilities specifically designated for such purpose.

State recreation trails, which will provide a variety of outdoor recreation uses in or reasonably accessible to urban areas. These trails may be of the following types: foot, horse, off-road motorized vehicles or nonmotorized bicycles as specifically designated by the department.

Connecting or side trails, which will provide additional points of public access to state recreation trails, state scenic trails, or which will provide connections between such trails. They shall be of the nature of the trails they serve.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 288, § 4.

148.640.
Criteria for various classes of trails.

Criteria for establishing the different classes of trails named in KRS 148.630 shall be as follows:

State scenic trails shall traverse mostly scenic and natural areas and shall be of sufficient length that they cannot be travelled in one (1) day or less. Scenic trails shall be narrow paths causing the minimum disturbance to the natural environment and shall be restricted to foot travel with all other modes of locomotion prohibited, except as set forth in KRS 148.630(1) and 148.720.

Horse and bicycle trails shall have a surface and overhead clearance appropriate for their designated mode of locomotion. Motorized vehicles of any kind shall be barred from foot, horse, and bicycle trails, except as set forth in KRS 148.720.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 288, § 5.

148.650.
Establishment and designation of trails.

State scenic trails shall be established and designated by the department on lands administered by the department and on lands under the jurisdiction of a state department, political subdivision, or private lands providing:

Such trails are not located in nor traverse any state-owned wildlife management area; and

Such trails meet the criteria established in KRS 148.610 to 148.780 and supplementary criteria as may be prescribed by the department.

The department may establish and designate state recreation trails on lands administered by the department and on lands under the jurisdiction of a state department, political subdivision, or private lands providing:

Such trails are not located in nor traverse any state-owned wildlife management area;

Such trails are reasonably accessible to urban areas;

Such trails meet the criteria established in KRS 148.610 to 148.780 and supplementary criteria as may be prescribed by the department; and

Fee simple, scenic easements, or other rights are obtained from private landowners through which a state recreation trail may pass. The department may establish and designate state recreation trails on lands under the jurisdiction of a federal agency, when in the opinion of the federal agency and the commissioner such lands may be so developed under the provisions of federal law and the provisions of paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection.

As provided in this section, trails within park, forest, recreation areas, state natural areas, or any other public area excluding state-owned wildlife management areas may be established and designated state recreation trails by the department.

Connecting or side trails within park, forest, recreation areas, or natural areas may be established, designated, and marked as components of a state recreation or state scenic trail.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 288, § 6.

148.660.
Proposals for additions to system.

The commissioner shall study and from time to time submit to the Governor and the General Assembly proposals for additions to the state scenic trails system and recreation trails that have been designated by the department, regarding rights-of-way that have been established and on the program for implementing KRS 148.610 to 148.780. Each proposal shall include a short statement on the significance of the various trails to the system.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 288, § 7; 1998, ch. 373, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

148.670.
Process of locating routes of trails.

The process of locating routes of trails in the system shall be as follows:

For state scenic trails, the department shall select a route. The selected route shall be compatible with the preservation and enhancement of the environment it traverses. Reasonable effort shall be made to minimize any adverse effects upon adjacent landowners and users. Notice of the selected route shall be published by the department in a newspaper of general circulation in the area in which the trail is located, together with appropriate maps and descriptions.

For state recreation trails and for connecting or side trails, the department shall select the route; provided, however, that when a route shall traverse land within the jurisdiction of a governmental unit or political subdivision, the department shall consult with such unit or such subdivision prior to its final determination for the location of the route.

In selecting routes and implementing KRS 148.610 to 148.780, the department is encouraged to confer with the recognized and established organizations primarily interested in trail development, conservation, and outdoor recreation. Furthermore, the General Assembly encourages citizen participation in trail acquisition, construction, development, and maintenance where such activities will not conflict with the purpose of KRS 148.610 to 148.780.

In the selection of the route for any trail, when the trail reaches an area of crop or fenced pasture land, the trail shall be so located as not to interfere in the growing of crops, or with the livestock, or pasture land, and such trail may then follow existing farm roads. The owner of such farm lands may enter a written agreement with the department to grant permission for the crossing of such crop or pasture land.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 288, § 8.

148.680.
Information forwarded by state agencies.

All state agencies shall inform the commissioner of any proceedings, studies, or other activities which may affect any component of the system.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 288, § 9.

148.690.
Determination of boundaries of abandoned rights-of-way and abandoned railroad corridors — Evaluation of potential for conversion to railtrail.

The department shall review all formal declarations of railroad right-of-way abandonments by the Surface Transportation Board or other agency with jurisdiction and may review former railroad corridors for possible inclusion in the state trails system. The commissioner shall, within three (3) years after the route of a trail or trail segment included in the system has been located, determine the boundaries of the right-of-way to be associated with that trail. Such boundaries shall be established in such a manner that they protect the scenic value of the trail.

The commissioner is authorized to develop effective procedures to assure that, wherever practicable, utility rights-of-way, abandoned railroad corridors, or similar properties having value for trail purposes may be made available for such use; however, the commissioner shall take into consideration the rights of adjacent property owners in the development of any such procedures. Other departments of state government having jurisdiction, control over, or information concerning the use, abandonment, or disposition of rights-of-way, railroad corridors, and similar properties that may be suitable for trail purposes shall cooperate with the commissioner in the transfer of these rights for trail use. These procedures shall include, at a minimum, that, for every railroad corridor that is the subject of a request for federal authority to discontinue service or for federal regulatory abandonment, the commissioner shall evaluate the potential of converting that corridor into a railtrail. The commissioner shall cause a preliminary review to be completed within thirty (30) days of the publication of the request for federal authority in the Federal Register. The commissioner shall cause a final review to be completed ninety (90) days after the publication of the request for federal authority in the Federal Register. The commissioner shall timely transmit copies of these reviews to the Legislative Research Commission and to the Commonwealth’s Railtrail Development Office in the Department for Local Government as they are completed. If either review indicates the possibility of converting the corridor into a railtrail, the commissioner may participate in the federal proceeding to request that the corridor be railbanked in accordance with federal law or to request the imposition of a public use condition.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 288, § 10; 1998, ch. 373, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 338, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 47, § 76, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 73, effective July 15, 2010.

148.700.
Acquisition of land or interest in land.

Within the exterior boundaries of the right-of-way, the commissioner may acquire, on behalf of the state, lands in fee title, or interest in land in the form of scenic easements, or cooperative agreements. Acquisition of land or of interest therein may be by gift, purchase with donated funds, funds appropriated by the General Assembly, proceeds from the sale of bonds, exchange, assumption of property tax payments, or otherwise. Acquisition of land or interest therein shall be accomplished with all possible speed. Such acquisition should not interfere with the growing of crops, or with the livestock, or pasture land on the remaining property of the farm owner.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 288, § 11.

148.710.
Preservation of natural vegetation, etc.

Within the exterior boundaries of the right-of-way, the natural vegetation shall be kept undisturbed except for any clearing required for construction of the trail, occasional vistas, or trail-use facilities described in KRS 148.750. The department shall make every effort to avoid any use of the right-of-way that is incompatible with the purposes for which the trails were established. Development and management of each segment of the state trails system shall be designed to harmonize with and complement any established multiple-use plans for that specific area in order to insure continual maximum benefits from the land. Other uses along the trail which will not substantially interfere with the nature and purposes of the trail may be permitted by the department; provided, that the owner of real property adjacent to any part of the system may hunt on that portion of the system which is adjacent to his property.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 288, § 12.

148.720.
Limitation on use of motorized vehicles.

The use of motorized vehicles by the general public within the right-of-way of any state scenic or recreation trail shall be prohibited and nothing in KRS 148.610 to 148.780 shall be construed as authorizing the use of motorized vehicles in these rights-of-way; provided, that the department shall establish regulations which shall authorize the use of motorized vehicles when such vehicles are required to meet emergencies where life or health is at risk, for the maintenance of established trails, or to enable present or adjacent landowners or land users to have access to their lands or timber rights where no reasonable alternative method of access exists or could be constructed. Prosecution for violation of this section may be initiated by a peace officer who witnessed an offense in violation of this section or by any private citizen who witnessed any violation of this section who is willing to make the initial charge and testify for the state.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 288, § 13.

148.730.
Effect of statutes on lands which are a part of more than one system.

Any component of the system that is a part of any state park, recreation area, or similar area shall be subject to the provisions of KRS 148.610 to 148.780 and the acts under which the other areas are administered, and in the case of conflict between the provisions of these acts the more restrictive provisions shall apply.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 288, § 14.

148.740.
Trail markers.

The department, in consultation with appropriate governmental agencies, and public and private organizations, shall establish a marker for trails contained in the system. An additional appropriate symbol characterizing specific trails may be included on the marker. The markers shall be placed at all access points, together with signs indicating the modes of locomotion that are prohibited for the trail; provided, that where the trail constitutes a portion of a national scenic trail, use of the national scenic trail uniform marker shall be considered sufficient. The route of the trail and the boundaries of the right-of-way shall be marked with paint or other simple means.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 288, § 15.

148.750.
Administration of system — Responsibility.

The Kentucky Trails System shall be administered by the department according to the policies and criteria set forth in KRS 148.610 to 148.780. The department shall have the responsibility for maintaining the trails and building bridges, campsites, shelters, and related public-use facilities where required. The department shall establish a trails coordinator to carry out the purposes of KRS 148.610 to 148.780.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 288, § 16; 1998, ch. 373, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.

148.760.
Procedure for relocation.

Segments of the state trails may be relocated when such relocation is deemed necessary to preserve or enhance the values for which the trails were established. Relocation may be accomplished by the department after consultation with other governmental agencies involved and following publication of notice in a newspaper of general circulation, together with maps and descriptions. In establishing the new location and right-of-way the procedures set forth in KRS 148.670 through 148.710, inclusive, shall be followed.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 288, § 17.

148.770.
Coordination with national trails system.

Nothing in KRS 148.610 to 148.780 shall preclude a component of the state trails system from becoming a part of the national trails system. The commissioner shall coordinate the state trails system with the national trails system and is directed to encourage and assist any federal studies for inclusion of the state’s trails in the national trails system. The commissioner may enter into written cooperative agreements for joint federal-state administration of a state component of the national trails system, provided such agreements for administration of land uses are not less restrictive than those set forth in KRS 148.610 to 148.780.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 288, § 18.

148.775.
Coordination of efforts to develop bicycling opportunities.

The department shall coordinate its efforts with and work with the Transportation Cabinet in so far as the provisions of KRS 148.610 to 148.780 and the provisions of KRS 174.100, 174.120, and 174.125 can be used to develop bicycling opportunities in the state.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 373, § 4, effective July 15, 1998.

148.780.
Owner’s consent required for access to or use of premises.

Nothing in KRS 148.610 to 148.780 shall be construed as authorizing any person to enter upon or use the land in any manner without the consent of the owner.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 288, § 19.

148.790.
Citation of KRS 148.610 to 148.780.

KRS 148.610 to 148.780 may be cited as the “Kentucky Trails System Act.”

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 288, § 1.